Utah statutes.
73-5a-501.   State engineer to inspect dams.

(1)  The state engineer shall inspect each dam that in the state engineer's opinion:

(a)  poses a threat to human life; or

(b)  could cause significant property damage if the dam failed. 

(2)  An inspection required by Subsection (1) shall occur:

(a)  at increments commensurate with the relative risk to life and property; and

(b)  not less than once every five years.

(3)  The state engineer may inspect a dam that is not exempt from regulation by this chapter.

